da: Seletype: Kropsbælte; Canyoning; Bryst; Helkrop til børn; Helkrop; Halvkrop; Industrielt arbejde; Sidde/sæde; Via ferrata; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta pasu: Delovni pas; Soteskanje; Prsni; Otroški za celotno telo; Za celotno telo; Za spodnji del telesa; Industrijsko delo; Sedeči/sedežni; Via Ferrata; Drugo
el: Τύπος καλωδίωσης: Ζώνη σώματος; Canyoning; Στήθους; Παιδικό ολόσωμο; Ολόσωμο; Μισού σώματος; Βιομηχανικής εργασίας; Καθίσματος; Via Ferrata; Άλλο
vi: Loại dây đai an toàn: Đai thắt lưng; Vượt thác; Ngực; Đai toàn thân cho trẻ em; Toàn thân; Bán thân; Công việc công nghiệp; Đai ngồi; Via Ferrata; Khác
sv: Seltyp: Stödbälte; Canyoning; Bröstsele; Helkroppssele för barn; Helkroppssele; Halvkroppssele; Industriarbete; Sittsele; Via ferrata; Övrigt
es: Tipo de arnés: Cinturón de sujeción; Barranquismo; Pecho; Cuerpo completo para niños; Cuerpo completo; Medio cuerpo; Trabajo industrial; Asiento/silla; Vía ferrata; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de ham: Centură de corp; Canioning; Piept; Corp complet pentru copii; Corp complet; Jumătate de corp; Muncă industrială; Șezut/scaun; Via Ferrata; Altele
tr: Koşum tipi: Gövde kemeri; Kanyon geçişi; Göğüs; Çocuk tam vücut; Tam vücut; Yarım vücut; Endüstriyel çalışma; Oturma; Via Ferrata; Diğer
fr: Type de mécanisme de harpe: Ceinture de maintien; Canyoning; Buste; Intégral pour enfant; Intégral; Cuissard; Travail industriel; Culotte/assise; Via ferrata; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de arnês: Cinto de segurança; Canionismo; Peitoral; Corpo inteiro infantil; Corpo inteiro; Meio corpo; Trabalho industrial; Assento; Via Ferrata; Outro
it: Tipo di imbracatura: Cintura di posizionamento; Canyoning; Pettorale; Completa per bambini; Completa; Bassa; Lavoro industriale; Bassa/a seggiolino; Via ferrata; Altro
ja: ハーネスタイプ: ボディベルト; キャニオニング; チェスト; 子供用フルボディ; フルボディ; ハーフボディ; 作業用; シット/シート; ヴィアフェラータ; その他
th: ประเภทของสายรัดนิรภัย: เข็มขัดนิรภัย; แคนยอนนิง; หน้าอก; เต็มตัวสำหรับเด็ก; เต็มตัว; ครึ่งตัว; งานอุตสาหกรรม; แบบนั่ง/ที่นั่ง; เวียเฟอร์ราตา; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип упряжи: Удерживающий пояс; Для каньонинга; Грудная; Детская полная; Полная; Нижняя; Для промышленных работ; Беседка/сидячая; Для виа-феррата; Другое
bg-BG: Тип предпазен колан: Колан за тяло; Каньонинг; Гърди; Детски за цяло тяло; За цяло тяло; За половин тяло; Индустриална работа; За сядане/седалка; Виа Ферата; Друго
fi: Valjaiden tyyppi: Tukivyö; Kanjonointi; Rinta; Lasten kokovartalo; Kokovartalo; Puolivartalo; Teollisuustyö; Istuma; Via ferrata; Muu
pl: Typ uprzęży: Pas biodrowy; Kanioning; Piersiowy; Pełny dziecięcy; Pełny; Biodrowy; Przemysłowy; Biodrowy; Via Ferrata; Inny
nl: Type harnas: Heupgordel; Canyoning; Borst; Integraalgordel kinderen; Integraalgordel; Zitgordel; Industrieel werk; Zit; Via ferrata; Overig
sk-SK: Typ postroja: Telový pás; Canyoning; Hrudný; Detský celotelový; Celotelový; Polotelový; Na prácu v priemysle; Sedací; Via Ferrata; Iné
ko: 하네스 유형: 바디 벨트; 캐니어닝; 가슴; 아동용 전신; 전신; 반신; 산업 작업용; 시트/좌식; 비아 페라타; 기타
nb: Seletype: Kroppsbelte; Juving; Bryst; Helkropp for barn; Helkropp; Halvkropp; Industrielt arbeid; Sitte / sete; Via ferrata; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de arnês: Cinto de segurança; Canyoning; Peito; Corpo inteiro de criança; Corpo inteiro; Meio corpo; Trabalho industrial; Cadeirinha; Via ferrata; Outro
hu: Heveder típusa: Testheveder; Kanyonozó; Mellheveder; Gyermek teljes testhevederzet; Teljes testhevederzet; Fél testhevederzet; Ipari munkás; Beülő heveder; Via ferrata; Egyéb
zh-TW: 吊帶類型: 護腰帶; 溪降; 胸部; 兒童全身式; 全身式; 半身式; 工業作業; 坐式; 鐵索攀岩; 其他
cs: Typ postroje: Polohovací pás; Canyoning; Hrudní; Dětský celotělový; Celotělový; Polotělový; Průmyslový pracovní; Sedací; Via Ferrata; Jiné
de: Gurttyp: Haltegurt; Canyoning; Brustgurt; Kinder-Komplettgurt; Komplettgurt; Sitzgurt; Industriegurt; Sitzgurt; Klettersteig; Sonstige
lt-LT: Apraišų tipas: Kūno diržas; Kanjoningo; Krūtinės; Vaikiški viso kūno; Viso kūno; Pusės kūno; Pramoninių darbų; Sėdimieji; „Via Ferrata“; Kita
en: Harness type: Body Belt; Canyoning; Chest; Children's Full Body; Full Body; Half Body; Industrial Work; Sit/Seat; Via Ferrata; Other
zh-CN: 安全带类型: 束腰带; 溪降; 胸式; 儿童全身式; 全身式; 半身式; 工业作业; 坐式; 飞拉达 (Via Ferrata); 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta pojasa: Pojas za tijelo; Kanjoning; Za prsa; Dječji pojas za cijelo tijelo; Za cijelo tijelo; Za pola tijela; Za industrijski rad; Sjedeći; Via Ferrata; Ostalo